Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2724
Equity purchase contract; provisions prohibited.

A provision in an equity purchase contract between an equity purchaser and a homeowner is void as against public policy if it attempts or purports to:

(1) Waive any of the rights specified in sections 76-2719 to 76-2727 or the right to a jury trial;

(2) Consent to jurisdiction for litigation or choice of law in a state other than Nebraska;

(3) Consent to venue in a county other than the county in which the residence in foreclosure is located; or

(4) Impose any costs or fees greater than the actual costs and fees.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 24.